California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(4) A person who is 18 through 20 years of age may be employed without a work permit and only in a position that is not supervisory, not related to the
 operation or administration of gambling, and not allowed to perform duties in an area in which gambling is conducted, until the person reaches 21 years of age, if the person wears a badge on their outermost garment at chest level with the words “Non-Gaming Employee: Under 21.” The badge shall have a different background color than the badges worn by other gambling enterprise employees.

(b) Except as provided in this section, a work permit shall not be issued by the commission or by any city, county, or city and county to any person who would be disqualified from holding a state gambling license for the reasons specified in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 19859.

(c) The department may object to the issuance of a work permit by a city, county, or city and county for
 any cause specified under this chapter deemed reasonable by the department, and if the department objects to issuance of a work permit, the work permit issued by a city, county, or city and county shall be denied.

(1) The commission shall adopt regulations specifying particular grounds for objection to issuance of, or refusal to issue, a work permit.

(2) The ordinance of any city, county, or city and county relating to issuance of work permits shall permit the department to object to the issuance of any permit.

(3) Any person whose application for a work permit has been denied because of an objection by the department may apply to the commission for an evidentiary hearing in accordance with regulations.

(d) Application for a work permit for use in any jurisdiction where a locally issued work permit is not required by the licensing authority of a city, county, or city and county shall be made to the department, and may be granted or denied by the commission for any cause specified under this chapter.

(1) If the commission denies the application, it shall include in its notice of denial a statement of facts upon which it relied in denying the application.

(2) Upon receipt of an application for a work permit, the commission may issue a temporary work permit for a period specified by the commission, pending completion of the background investigation by the department and official action by the commission with respect to
 the work permit application.

(e) An order of the commission denying an application for, or placing restrictions or conditions on, a work permit, including an order declining to issue a work permit following review pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), may be reviewed in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 19870.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 302, Sec. 7.   (AB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19913.

(a) The commission may issue an order summarily suspending a person’s work permit, whether issued by a city, county, or city and county, or by the commission, upon a finding that the suspension is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The order is effective when served upon the holder of the permit.

(b) The order of summary suspension shall state facts upon which the finding of necessity for the suspension is based. For the purposes of this section, the order of summary suspension shall be deemed an accusation.

(c) An order of summary suspension shall be signed by at least three members of the commission.

(d) The person whose work permit is summarily suspended has a right to a hearing to commence not more than 30 calendar days from the date of service of the suspension.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19911A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19914.

(a) The commission may revoke a work permit or, if issued by the licensing authority of a city, county, or city and county, notify the authority to revoke it, and the licensing authority shall revoke it, if the commission finds, after a hearing, that a gambling enterprise employee or independent agent has failed to disclose, misstated, or otherwise misled the department or the commission with respect to any fact contained in any application for a work permit, or if the commission finds that the employee or independent agent, subsequent to being issued a work permit, has done any of the following:

(1) Committed, attempted, or conspired to do any acts prohibited by this chapter.

(2) Engaged in any
 dishonest, fraudulent, or unfairly deceptive activities in connection with controlled gambling, or knowingly possessed or permitted to remain in or upon any premises any cards, dice, mechanical devices, or any other cheating device.

(3) Concealed or refused to disclose any material fact in any investigation by the department.

(4) Committed, attempted, or conspired to commit, any embezzlement or larceny against a gambling licensee or upon the premises of a gambling establishment.

(5) Been convicted in any jurisdiction of any offense involving or relating to gambling.

(6) Accepted employment without prior commission approval in a position for which the employee or independent agent could be required to be licensed under this chapter after having been
 denied a license or after failing to apply for licensing when requested to do so by the commission.

(7) Been refused the issuance of any license, permit, or approval to engage in or be involved with gambling or parimutuel wagering in any jurisdiction, or had the license, permit, or approval revoked or suspended.

(8) Been prohibited under color of governmental authority from being present upon the premises of any licensed gambling establishment or any establishment where parimutuel wagering is conducted, for any reason relating to improper gambling activities or any illegal act.

(9) Been convicted of any felony.

(b) The commission shall revoke a work permit if it finds, after hearing, that the holder thereof would be disqualified from holding a state
 gambling license for the reasons specified in subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 19859.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit any powers of the commission with respect to licensing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 16.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19915.

The fee for a work permit issued by the commission shall be not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19913A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Conditions of Operation [19920. - 19924.]

19920.

It is the policy of the State of California to require that all establishments wherein controlled gambling is conducted in this state be operated in a manner suitable to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare of the residents of the state. The responsibility for the employment and maintenance of suitable methods of operation rests with the owner licensee, and willful or persistent use or toleration of methods of operation deemed unsuitable by the commission or by local government shall constitute grounds for license revocation or other disciplinary action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19915A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19921.

(a) A person under 21 years of age is not permitted to enter upon the premises of a licensed gambling establishment, or any part thereof, except for the following areas:

(1) An area separated from a gambling area, used for a nongaming purpose, including for maintenance, parking, or business offices, or for the purpose of dining or food or beverage service or preparation. For purposes of this subdivision, a place where food or beverages are dispensed primarily by a vending machine is not a place for dining.

(2) Restrooms.

(3) A supervised room that is physically
 separated from a gambling area and used primarily for the purpose of entertainment or recreation.

(4) Those areas authorized in connection with employment in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 19911.

(b) A person who is under 21 years of age and not a gambling enterprise employee may enter upon or pass through a gambling area on a designated pathway to reach any of the areas described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) only if accompanied by a person or gambling enterprise employee who is 21 years of age or over.

(c) A person under 21 years of age shall not be permitted to loiter in a gaming area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 432, Sec. 5.   (AB 649)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19922.

No owner licensee shall operate a gambling enterprise in violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19916 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19923.

No owner licensee shall operate a gambling enterprise in violation of any governing local ordinance.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19917 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19924.

Each owner licensee shall maintain security controls over the gambling premises and all operations therein related to gambling, and those security controls are subject to the approval of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19918A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Disciplinary Actions [19930. - 19932.]

19930.

(a) The department shall make appropriate investigations as follows:

(1) Determine whether there has been any violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted thereunder.

(2) Determine any facts, conditions, practices, or matters that it may deem necessary or proper to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or any regulation adopted thereunder.

(3) To aid in adopting regulations.

(4) To secure information as a basis for recommending legislation relating to this chapter.

(b) If, after any investigation, the department is satisfied that a license, permit, finding of suitability, or approval should be suspended or revoked, it shall file an accusation with the commission in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) In addition to any action that the commission may take against a license, permit, finding of suitability, or approval, the commission may also require the payment of fines or penalties. However, no fine imposed shall exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each separate violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted thereunder.

(d) In any case in which the administrative law judge recommends that the commission revoke, suspend, or deny a license, the administrative law judge may, upon presentation of suitable proof, order the licensee or applicant for a license to pay the department the reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(1) The costs assessed pursuant to this subdivision shall be fixed by the administrative law judge and may not be increased by the commission. When the commission does not adopt a proposed decision and remands the case to the administrative law judge, the administrative law judge may not increase the amount of any costs assessed in the proposed decision.

(2) The department may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county in which the administrative hearing was held. The right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights that the department may have as to any licensee directed to pay costs.

(3) In any judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the commission’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the fines and penalties account, a special account described in subdivision (a) of Section 19950.

(f) For purposes of this section, “costs” include costs incurred for any of the following:

(1) The investigation of the case by the department.

(2) The preparation and prosecution of the case by the Office of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 38.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19931.

(a) The department may issue any emergency orders against an owner licensee, or any person involved in a transaction requiring prior approval, that the department deems reasonably necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(b) The emergency order shall set forth the grounds
 upon which it is based, including a statement of facts constituting the alleged emergency necessitating the action.

(c) The emergency order is effective immediately upon issuance and service upon the owner licensee or any agent of the licensee registered with the department for receipt of service, or, in cases involving prior approval, upon issuance and service upon the person or entity involved, or upon an agent of that person or entity authorized to accept service of process in this state. The emergency order may suspend, limit, condition, or take other action in relation to the license of one or more persons in an operation without affecting other individual licensees, registrants, or the licensed gambling establishment. The emergency order remains effective until further order of the commission at a meeting or final disposition of
 a proceeding conducted pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) Within two calendar days after issuance of an emergency order, the department shall file an accusation with the commission against the person or entity involved. Thereafter, the person or entity against whom the emergency order has been issued and served is entitled to a hearing that, if so requested, shall commence within 10 business days of the date of the request if a gambling operation is closed by the order, and in all other cases, within 30 calendar days of the date of the request. On application of the department, and for good cause shown, a court may extend the time within which a hearing is required to be commenced, upon those terms and
 conditions that the court deems equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 553, Sec. 4.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19932.

(a) Any person aggrieved by a final decision or order of the commission that limits, conditions, suspends, or revokes any previously granted license or approval, made after hearing by the commission, may petition the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento for judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Section 11523 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the standard set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply for obtaining a stay of the operation of a final decision or order of the commission. In every case where it is claimed that the findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are
 not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(b) The court may summarily deny the petition, or the court may issue an alternative writ directing the commission to certify the whole record in the case to the court within a time specified. No new or additional evidence shall be introduced in the court, but, if an alternative writ issues, the cause shall be heard on the whole record as certified by the commission.

(c) In determining the cause following issuance of an alternative writ, the court shall enter judgment affirming, modifying, or reversing the order of the commission, or the court may remand the case for further proceedings before, or reconsideration by, the commission.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in Section 19870 and subdivision (e) in Section 19912, this section provides the
 exclusive means to review adjudicatory decisions of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 19.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Penalties [19940. - 19944.]

19940.

Any person included on the list of persons to be excluded or ejected from a gambling establishment pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor if he or she thereafter knowingly enters the premises of a licensed gambling establishment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19930 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19941.

(a) A person under 21 years of age shall not do any of the following:

(1) Play, be allowed to play, place wagers at, or collect winnings from, whether personally or through an agent, a gambling game.

(2) Be employed as an employee in a licensed gambling establishment, except as provided in Section 19912.

(3) Present or offer to a licensee, or to an agent of a licensee, written, printed, or photostatic evidence of age and identity that is false, fraudulent, or not actually the person’s own for the purpose of doing any of the things described in paragraphs (1) and
 (2).

(4) Loiter in or about a room in which a gambling game is operated or conducted.

(b) A licensee or employee in a gambling establishment who knowingly violates or knowingly permits the violation of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) A person under 21 years of age who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Proof that a licensee, or agent or employee of a licensee, demanded, was shown, and acted in reliance upon bona fide evidence of age and identity shall be a defense to any criminal prosecution under this section or to any proceeding for the suspension or revocation of a license or
 work permit based thereon.
 For the purposes of this section, “bona fide evidence of age and identity” means a document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator’s license or an identification card issued to a member of the Armed Forces, that contains the name, date of birth, description, and picture of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 432, Sec. 6.   (AB 649)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19942.

(a) Any person who willfully fails to report, pay, or truthfully account for and pay over any license fee imposed by this chapter, or who willfully attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the license fee or payment thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter for which a penalty is not expressly provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19933 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19943.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (c), this section applies to any person or business that is engaged in controlled gambling, whether or not licensed to do so.

(b) Any person or business described in subdivision (a), with actual knowledge of the requirements of regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 19841, that knowingly and willfully fails to comply with the requirements of those regulations shall be liable for a monetary penalty. The commission may impose a monetary penalty for each violation. However, in the first proceeding that is initiated pursuant to this subdivision, the penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). If a penalty was imposed in a prior proceeding before the commission, the penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). If a penalty was imposed in two or more prior proceedings before the commission, the penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) This section does not apply to any case where the person is criminally prosecuted in federal or state court for conduct related to a violation of Section 14162 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19933.5A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19943.5.

If a gambling enterprise conducts play of a controlled game that has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 19826, and the controlled game is subsequently found to be unlawful, so long as the game was played in the manner approved, the approval by the department shall be an absolute defense to any criminal, administrative, or civil action that may be brought, provided that the game is played during the time for which it was approved by the department and the gambling enterprise ceases play upon notice that the game has been found unlawful. In any enforcement action, the gambling enterprise shall have the burden of proving the department approved the controlled game and that the game was played in the manner approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 391, Sec. 3.   (AB 156)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19944.

Any person who willfully resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the department or the commission or any of their agents or employees in the performance of duties pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 41.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Revenues [19950. - 19955.]

19950.

(a) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in a special account in the General Fund, and, upon appropriation, may be expended by the Department of Justice to offset costs incurred pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), all fees and revenue collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Gambling Control Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The funds deposited in the Gambling Control Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the department and commission exclusively for the support of the department and commission in carrying out their duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 42.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19951.

(a) Every application for a license or approval shall be accompanied by a fee as determined by the commission and adopted by regulation. The adopted fee shall not exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200).

(b) (1) Any fee paid pursuant to this section,
 including all licenses issued to key employees and other persons whose names are endorsed upon the license, shall be assessed against the gambling license issued to the owner of the gambling establishment. This paragraph shall not apply to key employee licenses issued on and after January 1, 2009, or the implementation of regulations establishing a personal key employee license adopted pursuant to Section 19854, whichever is sooner.

(2) (A) The fee for initial issuance of a state gambling license shall be an amount determined by the commission in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(B) The fee for the renewal of a state gambling license shall be
 an amount determined by the commission in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The department may provide for payment of the annual gambling license fee on an annual or installment basis.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fees paid pursuant to this section are sufficient to enable the department and the commission to fully carry out
 their duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

(e) The amount of fees collected pursuant to this section shall be limited to the reasonable regulatory expenditures of the department and the commission to administer this chapter.

(f) (1) Beginning January 1, 2023, and every two years thereafter, the commission shall provide a report to the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature detailing the fee levels established by the commission through regulations.

(2) The report required
 by this subdivision shall describe how fees for each licensing category were calculated, including how licensee gross revenues and state regulatory costs were used in the calculation. If a workload-based methodology is used to establish fees, the commission shall include in its report a breakdown of the personnel cost, operating cost, and overhead cost figures used to determine fee levels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 3.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19952.

The commission, by regulation, shall establish fees for special licenses authorizing irregular operation of tables in excess of the total number of tables otherwise authorized to a licensed gambling establishment, for tournaments and other special events.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19942A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19953.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to restrict or limit the power of any city, county, or city and county to fix, impose, and collect a license tax.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19944 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19954.

In addition to those fees required pursuant to Section 19951, each licensee shall pay an additional one hundred dollars ($100) for each table for which it is licensed to the State Department of Public Health for deposit in the Gambling Addiction Program Fund, which is hereby established to benefit those who have a gambling addiction problem. These funds shall be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to community-based organizations that directly provide aid and assistance to those persons with a gambling addiction problem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 3.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

19955.

If an owner licensee fails to make timely payment of annual fees required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19951, the commission may order the temporary closure of the gambling establishment for up to 90 days after the payment due date, after which time, if the fees, or any portion thereof, remain unpaid, the gambling establishment’s state gambling license shall be deemed surrendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   (AB 2596)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Local Governments [19960. - 19966.]

19960.

This chapter shall not prohibit the enactment, amendment, or enforcement of any ordinance by any city, county, or city and county relating to licensed gambling establishments that is not inconsistent with this chapter. No city, county, or city and county shall issue a gambling license with respect to any gambling establishment unless one of the following is true:

(a) The gambling establishment is located in a city, county, or city and county wherein, after January 1, 1984, an ordinance was adopted by the electors of the city, county, or city and county, in an election conducted pursuant to former Section 19819 of the Business and Professions Code, as that section read immediately before its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter.

(b) The gambling establishment is located in a city, county, or city and county wherein, prior to January 1, 1984, there was in effect an ordinance that expressly authorized the operation of one or more cardrooms.

(c) After the effective date of this chapter, a majority of the electors voting thereon affirmatively approve a measure permitting controlled gambling within that city, county, or city and county.

(1) The measure to permit controlled gambling shall appear on the ballot in substantially the following form: 
“Shall licensed gambling establishments in which any controlled games permitted by law, such as draw poker, low-ball poker, panguine (pan), seven-card stud, or other lawful card games or tile games, are played, be allowed in _____? Yes ____ No ____.”

(2) In addition, the initial implementing ordinances shall be drafted and appear in full on the sample ballot and shall set forth at least all of the following:

(A) The hours of operation.

(B) The games to be played.

(C) The wagering limits.

(D) The maximum number of gambling establishments permitted by the ordinance.

(E) The maximum number of tables permitted in each gambling establishment.

(d) The authorization of subdivision (c) is subject to Sections 19962 and 19963 until those sections are repealed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19950 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), on or after the effective date of this chapter, any amendment to any ordinance that would result in an expansion of gambling in the city, county, or city and county, shall not be valid unless the amendment is submitted for approval to the voters of the city, county, or city and county, and is approved by a majority of the electors voting thereon.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and Section 19962, an ordinance may be amended without the approval of the electors after the effective date of this chapter to expand gambling by a change that results in an increase of less than 25 percent with respect to any of the matters set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (5) of subdivision (b). Thereafter, any additional expansion shall be approved by a majority of the electors voting thereon.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “expansion of gambling” means, when compared to that authorized on January 1, 1996, or under an ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19960, whichever is the lesser number, a change that results in any of the following:

(1) An increase of 25 percent or more in the number of gambling tables in the city, county, or city and county.

(2) An increase of 25 percent or more in the number of licensed card rooms in the city, county, or city and county.

(3) An increase of 25 percent or more in the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(4) The authorization of any additional form of gambling, other than card games, that may be legally played in this state, to be played at a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(5) An increase of 25 percent or more in the hours of operation of a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(c) The measure to expand gambling shall appear on the ballot in substantially the following form: “Shall gambling be expanded in ____ beyond that operated or authorized on January 1, 1996, by ____ (describe expansion) Yes ____ No ____.”

(d) The authorization of subdivision (c) is subject to Sections 19962 and 19963 until those sections are repealed.

(e) Increasing the number of games offered in a gambling establishment does not constitute an expansion of gambling pursuant to this section.

(f) No city, county, or city and county shall amend its ordinance in a cumulative manner to increase gambling by more than 25 percent for the factors listed in subdivision (b), when compared to that authorized on January 1, 1996, without conducting an election pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.05.

Notwithstanding Sections 19961 and 19962, a city, county, or city and county may amend its ordinance to increase the operating hours of a gambling establishment to up to 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   (SB 654)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.06.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19961 and 19962, a city, county, or city and county may amend an ordinance to increase by two the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county, above the number of tables authorized in the ordinance that was in effect on January 1, 2010. A city, county, or city and county may exercise the authority provided by this
 subdivision only one time, but this authority shall be in addition to any authorization under any other law for a city, county, or city and county to increase the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 19961 and 19962, and in addition to the authorization granted by subdivision (a), a city, county, or city and county may amend an ordinance to increase by two the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county, above the number of tables authorized in the ordinance that was in effect on January 1, 2013. A city, county, or city and county may exercise the authority provided by this subdivision only one time, but this authority shall be in addition to any
 authorization under any other law for a city, county, or city and county to increase the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   (AB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.07.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19961 and 19962, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a city, county, or city and county may amend an ordinance to increase the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment as follows:

(1) The ordinance shall apply only to a gambling establishment that operates fewer than 20 gambling tables.

(2) The ordinance shall allow a gambling establishment to increase the number of gambling tables operated at the gambling establishment by up to 2 additional tables within the first year after the ordinance takes effect, and up to 2 additional tables every four years thereafter, not to exceed 10 additional tables above the
 number of tables operated at the gambling establishment on January 1, 2023. A gambling establishment shall have all permitted gambling tables in operation and remain current in payment on all taxes and other applicable fees before an increase in gambling tables is allowed pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) (1) The authority provided in subdivision (a) shall be in addition to any authorization under any other law in effect on December 31, 2022, for a city, county, or city and county to increase the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment in the city, county, or city and county.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a city, county, or city and county that increased the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19962.

(c) A city, county, or city and county’s jurisdictional limit may expand to accommodate the increase of gambling tables pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.1.

Any amendment to a city or county ordinance relating to gambling establishments, or the Gambling Control Act, shall be submitted to the department for review and comment, before the ordinance is adopted by the city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 44.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19962.

(a) The governing body or the electors of a city, county, or city and county that has not authorized legal gambling within its boundaries prior to January 1, 1996, shall not authorize legal gambling.

(b) (1) An ordinance in effect on January 1, 1996, that authorizes legal gambling within a city, county, or city and county shall not be amended to expand gambling in that jurisdiction beyond that permitted on January 1, 1996.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an ordinance that was approved by a majority of the voters in a city, county, or city and county in an election that occurred after November 1, 2020, that authorizes an increase in the number of gambling
 tables at a gambling establishment, and that became operative on January 1, 2023, as the result of the repeal of former Section 19962, as amended by Chapter 1 of Section 744 of the Statutes of 2018, shall continue to be valid on and after January 1, 2024.

(3) Any amendment to an ordinance or adoption of an ordinance on or after January 1, 2023, by a city, county, or city and county resulting in an expansion of gambling that was not authorized or permitted under this chapter as of December 31, 2022, or that is not authorized or permitted under this section or Section 19961.07 shall be invalid and preempted.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2043, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2043, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19963.

(a) In addition to any other limitation on the expansion of gambling imposed by Section 19962 or any provision in this chapter, the commission shall not issue a gambling license for a gambling establishment that was not licensed to operate on December 31, 1999, unless an application to operate that establishment was on file with the department prior to September 1, 2000.

(b) An application for a gambling license for a gambling establishment that was not licensed to operate on December 31, 2022, that is pending before the commission as of January 1, 2024, shall not be approved by the commission.

(c) A gambling license for a gambling establishment that was not licensed to operate on
 December 31, 2022, and that was issued between December 31, 2022, and January 1, 2024, shall be invalid.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2043, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2043, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19964.
